Nebraska, session 109, LB607.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 13-2001, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
13-2001 Sections 13-2001 to 13-2043 and sections 3, 5 to 14, 17, and
18 of this act shall be known and may be cited as the Integrated Solid
Waste Management Act.
Sec. 2. Section 13-2003, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
13-2003 For purposes of the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act,
the definitions found in sections 13-2004 to 13-2016.01 and sections 3
and 5 to 14 of this act shall be used.
Sec. 3. Depolymerization means a manufacturing process where post-
use polymers are broken into smaller molecules such as monomers and
oligomers or raw, intermediate, or final products, plastic and chemical
feedstocks, basic and unfinished chemicals, waxes, lubricants, and
coatings.
Sec. 4. Section 13-2010, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
13-2010 Facility shall mean any site owned and operated or utilized
by any person for the collection, source separation, storage,
transportation, transfer, processing, treatment, or disposal of solid
waste and shall include a solid waste landfill. Facility shall not
include a manufacturing facility.
Sec. 5. Gasification means a manufacturing process through which
post-use polymers or recovered feedstocks are heated in an oxygen-
controlled atmosphere and converted into syngas, followed by conversion
into valuable raw, intermediate, and final products, including, but not
limited to, plastic monomers, chemicals, waxes, lubricants, coatings, and
plastic and chemical feedstocks that are returned to economic utility in
the form of raw materials or products.
Sec. 6. Manufacturing facility means a facility engaging in any
manufacturing process where sorted post-use polymers and recovered
-2-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
feedstocks are purchased and then converted into basic raw materials,
feedstocks, chemicals, and other products through processes including
pyrolysis, gasification, depolymerization, catalytic cracking, reforming,
hydrogenation, solvolysis, chemolysis, and other similar technologies.
The products produced at manufacturing facilities include, but are not
limited to, monomers, oligomers, plastics, plastic and chemical
feedstocks, basic and unfinished chemicals, waxes, lubricants, coatings,
and adhesives, but shall not include fuels. The manufacturing process of
a manufacturing facility shall be considered recycling. The manufacturing
process of a manufacturing facility shall not be considered solid waste
management, solid waste processing, solid waste recovery, incineration,
treatment, or waste-to-energy.
Sec. 7. Mass balance attribution means a chain of custody
accounting methodology with rules defined by a third-party certification
system that enables the attribution of the mass of manufacturing facility
feedstocks to one or more manufacturing facility products.
Sec. 8. Post-use polymer means a plastic to which all of the
following apply:
(1) The plastic is derived from any industrial, commercial,
agricultural, or domestic activities and includes plastic in pre-consumer
recovered materials and post-consumer materials;
(2) The plastic has been sorted from solid waste and other regulated
waste but may contain residual amounts of waste such as organic material
and incidental contaminants or impurities such as paper labels and metal
rings;
(3) The plastic is not mixed with solid waste or hazardous waste
onsite or during processing at the manufacturing facility;
(4) The plastic's use or intended use is as a feedstock for the
manufacturing of feedstocks, raw materials, or other intermediate
products or final products using manufacturing processes of a
manufacturing facility; and
-3-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
(5) The plastic is processed at a manufacturing facility or held at
such facility prior to processing.
Sec. 9. Pyrolysis means a manufacturing process through which post-
use polymers or recovered feedstocks are heated in the absence of oxygen
until melted and thermally decomposed, noncatalytically or catalytically,
and are then cooled, condensed, and converted into valuable raw materials
and intermediate and final products, including, but not limited to,
plastic monomers, chemicals, naphtha, waxes, and plastic and chemical
feedstocks that are returned to economic utility in the form of raw
materials and products.
Sec. 10. Recovered feedstock means one or more of the following
materials that has been processed so that it may be used as feedstock in
a manufacturing facility:
(1) Post-use polymers;
(2) Materials for which the United States Environmental Protection
Agency has made a nonwaste determination or has otherwise determined are
feedstocks and not solid waste;
(3) Recovered feedstock that does not include unprocessed municipal
solid waste; or
(4) Recovered feedstock that is not mixed with solid waste or
hazardous waste onsite or during processing at a manufacturing facility.
Sec. 11. Recycled plastic means a product that is produced from (1)
mechanical recycling of pre-consumer recovered feedstocks or plastics and
post-consumer plastics or (2) the manufacturing of pre-consumer recovered
feedstocks or plastics and post-consumer plastics via mass balance
attribution under a third-party certification system.
Sec. 12. Recycling means the process of separating, cleaning,
treating, and reconstituting waste or other discarded materials for the
purpose of recovering and reusing the resources contained therein.
Sec. 13. Solvolysis means a manufacturing process through which
post-use polymers are purified with the aid of solvents while heated at
-4-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
low temperatures or pressurized to make useful products allowing
additives and contaminants to be removed. The products of solvolysis
include monomers, intermediates, valuable chemicals, plastic and chemical
feedstocks, and raw materials. Solvolysis includes, but is not limited
to, hydrolysis, aminolysis, ammonoloysis, methanolysis, and glycolysis.
Sec. 14. Third-party certification system means an international
and multinational third-party certification system which consists of a
set of rules for the implementation of mass balance attribution
approaches for the manufacturing process of a manufacturing facility.
Third-party certification system includes, but is not limited to, the
International Sustainability and Carbon Certification, Underwriter
Laboratories, SCS Recycled Content, Roundtable on Sustainable
Biomaterials, Ecoloop, and REDcert2.
Sec. 15. Section 13-2034, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
13-2034 (1) The council shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations which shall include the following:
(a) (1) A permit program for facilities providing for permits to be
issued to owners and operators;
(b) (2) Requirements for the collection, source separation, storage,
transportation, transfer, processing, recycling, resource recovery,
treatment, and disposal of solid wastes as well as developmental and
operational plans for facilities. Regulations concerning operations may
include waste characterization, composition, and source identification,
site improvements, air and methane gas monitoring, ground water and
surface water monitoring, daily cover, insect and rodent control, salvage
operations, waste tire disposal, safety and restricted access, inspection
of loads and any other necessary inspection or verification requirements,
reporting of monitoring analysis, record-keeping requirements and other
reporting requirements, handling and disposal of wastes with special
characteristics, and any other operational criteria, location criteria,
-5-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
or design criteria necessary to minimize environmental and health risks
and to provide protection of the air, land, and waters of the state; and
(c) (3) Requirements for closure, postclosure care and monitoring,
and investigative and corrective action with respect to landfills. Such
rules and regulations shall require financial assurance for such
activities after April 9, 1996. Such rules and regulations shall impose
any necessary requirements upon owners or operators in order to assure
proper closure, care, monitoring, and investigative and corrective action
with respect to landfills to minimize the need for future maintenance and
eliminate, to the extent necessary to protect humans, animals, and the
environment, releases or the threat of releases of contaminants or
leachate.
(2) Rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to this
section shall not apply to manufacturing processes of manufacturing
facilities.
Sec. 16. Section 13-2042, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
13-2042 (1) A disposal fee of one dollar and twenty-five cents is
imposed for each six cubic yards of uncompacted solid waste, one dollar
and twenty-five cents for each three cubic yards of compacted solid
waste, and or one dollar and twenty-five cents per ton of solid waste (a)
disposed of at landfills regulated by the department or (b) transported
for disposal out of state from a solid waste processing facility holding
a permit under the Integrated Solid Waste Management Act. Each operator
of a landfill or solid waste processing facility shall make the fee
payment quarterly. The fee shall be paid quarterly to the department on
or before the forty-fifth day following the end of each quarter. For
purposes of this section, landfill has the same definition as municipal
solid waste landfill unit in 40 C.F.R. 258.2.
(2) Each fee payment shall be accompanied by a form prepared and
furnished by the department and completed by the permitholder. The form
-6-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
shall state the total volume of solid waste disposed of at the landfill
or transported for disposal out of state from the solid waste processing
facility during the payment period and shall provide any other
information deemed necessary by the department. The form shall be signed
by the permitholder.
(3) If a permitholder fails to make a timely payment of the fee, he
or she shall pay interest on the unpaid amount at the rate specified in
section 45-104.02, as such rate may from time to time be adjusted.
(4) This section shall not apply to a site used solely for the
reclamation of land through the introduction of landscaping rubble or
inert material.
(5) Fifty percent of the total of such fees collected in each
quarter shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the
Integrated Solid Waste Management Cash Fund and shall be used by the
department to cover the direct and indirect costs of responding to spills
or other environmental emergencies, of regulating, investigating,
remediating, and monitoring facilities during and after operation of
facilities, or of performance of regulated activities under the
Integrated Solid Waste Management Act, the Nebraska Litter Reduction and
Recycling Act, and the Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive Act. The
department may seek recovery of expenses paid from the fund for
responding to spills or other environmental emergencies or for
investigation, remediation, and monitoring of a facility from any person
who owned, operated, or used the facility in violation of the Integrated
Solid Waste Management Act, the Nebraska Litter Reduction and Recycling
Act, and the Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive Act in a civil
action filed in the district court of Lancaster County.
(6)(a) The remaining fifty percent of the total of such fees
collected per quarter shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit
to the Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive Fund. For purposes of
determining the total fees collected, any amount of fees rebated pursuant
-7-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
to section 13-2042.01 shall be included as if the fees had not been
rebated, and the amount of the fees rebated pursuant to such section
shall be deducted from the amount to be credited to the Waste Reduction
and Recycling Incentive Fund.
(b) From the fees credited to the Waste Reduction and Recycling
Incentive Fund under this subsection:
(i) Grants shall be awarded to counties, municipalities, and
agencies, and private businesses for the purposes of planning and
implementing facilities and systems to further the goals of the
Integrated Solid Waste Management Act. The grant proceeds shall not be
used to fund landfill closure site assessments, closure, monitoring, or
investigative or corrective action costs for existing landfills or
landfills already closed prior to July 15, 1992. The council shall adopt
and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this subdivision. Such
rules and regulations shall base the awarding of grants on a project's
reflection of the integrated solid waste management policy and hierarchy
established in section 13-2018, the proposed amount of local matching
funds, and community need; and
(ii) The department may disburse amounts to political subdivisions
for costs incurred in response to and remediation of any solid waste
disposed of or abandoned at dump sites or discrete locations along public
roadways or ditches and on any contiguous area affected by such disposal
or abandonment. Such reimbursement shall be by application to the
department on forms prescribed by the department. The department shall
prepare and make available a schedule of eligible costs and application
procedures which may include a requirement of a demonstration of
preventive measures to be taken to discourage future dumping. The
department may not disburse to political subdivisions an amount which in
the aggregate exceeds five percent of total revenue from the disposal
fees collected pursuant to this section in the preceding fiscal year.
These disbursements shall be made on a fiscal-year basis, and
-8-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
applications received after funds for this purpose have been exhausted
may be eligible during the next fiscal year but are not an obligation of
the state. Any eligible costs incurred by a political subdivision which
are not funded due to a lack of funds shall not be considered an
obligation of the state. In disbursing funds under this subdivision, the
director shall make efforts to ensure equal geographical distribution
throughout the state and may deny reimbursements in order to accomplish
this goal.
(7) The disposal fee shall be:
(a) Beginning January 1, 2026, and on or before December 31, 2026,
two dollars and twenty-five cents;
(b) Beginning January 1, 2027, and on or before December 31, 2027,
three dollars and twenty-five cents; and
(c) Beginning January 1, 2028, four dollars and twenty-five cents.
Sec. 17. The owner or operator of a manufacturing facility shall be
responsible for the proper disposal of all post-use polymers or recovered
feedstocks stored on the premises of such manufacturing facility within
sixty days after ceasing manufacturing operations.
Sec. 18. Manufacturing facilities are subject to applicable
Department of Environment and Energy manufacturing rules and regulations
for air, water, waste, and land use.
Sec. 19. Sections 19 to 37 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Environmental Stewardship of Batteries Act.
Sec. 20. The Legislature finds that:
(1) It is in the public interest of the residents of Nebraska to
encourage the recovery and reuse of materials, such as metals, that
replace the output of mining and other extractive industries;
(2) Without a dedicated battery stewardship program, battery user
confusion regarding proper disposal options will continue to persist;
(3) Ensuring the proper handling, recycling, and end-of-life
management of used batteries prevents the release of toxic materials into
-9-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
the environment and removes materials from the waste stream that, if
mishandled, may present safety concerns to workers, such as by igniting
fires at solid waste handling facilities. For this reason, batteries
should not be placed into commingled recycling containers or disposed of
via traditional garbage collection containers; and
(4) Jurisdictions around the world have successfully implemented
battery stewardship laws that have helped address the challenges posed by
the end-of-life management of batteries. Because it is difficult for
customers to differentiate between types and chemistries of batteries, it
is the best practice for battery stewardship programs to collect all
battery types and chemistries. Furthermore, it is appropriate for larger
batteries used in emerging market sectors such as electric vehicles,
solar power arrays, and data centers, to be managed to ensure
environmentally positive outcomes similar to those achieved by a battery
stewardship program, both because of the potential economic value of
large batteries used for these purposes and the anticipated profusion of
these larger batteries as these market sectors mature.
Sec. 21. For purposes of the Environmental Stewardship of Batteries
Act, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) Battery-containing product means a product that contains or is
packaged with rechargeable or primary batteries that are covered
batteries;
(2) Battery management hierarchy means a management system of
covered batteries prioritized in descending order as follows:
(a) Waste prevention and reduction;
(b) Reuse, when reuse is appropriate;
(c) Recycling; and
(d) Other means of end-of-life management, which may only be
utilized after demonstrating to the department that it is not feasible to
manage the batteries under the higher priority options in subdivisions
(2)(a) through (c) of this section;
-10-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
(3) Battery stewardship organization means a producer that directly
implements a battery stewardship plan required under the Environmental
Stewardship of Batteries Act or a nonprofit organization designated by a
producer or group of producers to implement a battery stewardship plan
required under the act;
(4) Collection rate means a percentage, by weight, that a battery
stewardship organization collects that is calculated by dividing the
total weight of primary and rechargeable batteries collected during the
previous calendar year by the average annual weight of primary and
rechargeable batteries that were estimated to have been sold in the state
by all producers participating in an approved battery stewardship plan
during the previous three calendar years;
(5)(a) Covered battery means a portable battery or, beginning
January 1, 2029, a medium format battery.
(b) Covered battery does not include:
(i) A battery contained within a medical device, as specified in 21
U.S.C. 321(h), as such section existed on January 1, 2025, that is not
designed and marketed for sale or resale principally to consumers for
personal use;
(ii) A battery that contains an electrolyte as a free liquid;
(iii) A lead acid battery weighing greater than eleven pounds; and
(iv) A battery in a battery-containing product that is not intended
or designed to be easily removable from the battery-containing product;
(6) Department means the Department of Environment and Energy;
(7) Easily removable means designed by the manufacturer to be
removable by the user of the product with no more than commonly used
household tools;
(8) Environmentally sound management practice means any practice
that:
(a) Complies with all applicable laws and rules to protect workers,
public health, and the environment;
-11-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
(b) Provides for adequate recordkeeping, tracking, and documenting
of the fate of materials within the state and beyond; and
(c) Includes comprehensive liability coverage for the battery
stewardship organization, including environmental liability coverage that
is commercially practicable;
(9) Final disposition means the final processing of a collected
battery to produce usable end products, at the point where the battery
has been reduced to its constituent parts, reusable portions made
available for use, and any residues handled as wastes in accordance with
applicable law;
(10) Large format battery means:
(a) A rechargeable battery that weighs more than twenty-five pounds
or has a rating of more than two thousand watt-hours; or
(b) A primary battery that weighs more than twenty-five pounds;
(11) Medium format battery means the following primary or
rechargeable covered batteries:
(a) For rechargeable batteries, a battery weighing more than eleven
pounds or having a rating of more than three hundred watt-hours, or both,
and weighing no more than twenty-five pounds and having a rating of no
more than two thousand watt-hours; and
(b) For primary batteries, a battery weighing more than four and
four-tenths pounds but not more than twenty-five pounds;
(12) Portable battery means the following primary or rechargeable
covered batteries:
(a) For rechargeable batteries, a battery weighing no more than
eleven pounds and having a rating of no more than three hundred watt-
hours; and
(b) For primary batteries, a battery weighing no more than four and
four-tenths pounds;
(13) Primary battery means a battery that is not capable of being
recharged;
-12-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
(14)(a) Producer means the following person responsible for
compliance with requirements under the Environmental Stewardship of
Batteries Act for a covered battery or battery-containing product sold,
offered for sale, or distributed in or into this state:
(i) For covered batteries:
(A) If the battery is sold under the brand of the battery
manufacturer, the producer is the person that manufactures the battery;
(B) If the battery is sold under a retail brand or under a brand
owned by a person other than the manufacturer, the producer is the brand
owner;
(C) If there is no person to which subdivision (14)(a)(i)(A) or (B)
of this section applies, the producer is the person that is the licensee
of a brand or trademark under which the battery is used in a commercial
enterprise, sold, offered for sale, or distributed in or into this state,
whether or not the trademark is registered in this state;
(D) If there is no person described in subdivisions (14)(a)(i)(A)
through (C) of this section within the United States, the producer is the
person who is the importer of record for the battery into the United
States for use in a commercial enterprise that sells, offers for sale, or
distributes the battery in this state; and
(E) If there is no person described in subdivisions (14)(a)(i)(A)
through (D) of this section with a commercial presence within the state,
the producer is the person who first sells, offers for sale, or
distributes the battery in or into this state; and
(ii) For covered battery-containing products:
(A) If the battery-containing product is sold under the brand of the
product manufacturer, the producer is the person that manufactures the
product;
(B) If the battery-containing product is sold under a retail brand
or under a brand owned by a person other than the manufacturer, the
producer is the brand owner;
-13-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
(C) If there is no person to which subdivision (14)(a)(ii)(A) or (B)
of this section applies, the producer is the person that is the licensee
of a brand or trademark under which the product is used in a commercial
enterprise, sold, offered for sale, or distributed in or into this state,
whether or not the trademark is registered in this state;
(D) If there is no person described in subdivisions (14)(a)(ii)(A)
through (C) of this section within the United States, the producer is the
person who is the importer of record for the product into the United
States for use in a commercial enterprise that sells, offers for sale, or
distributes the product in this state; and
(E) If there is no person described in subdivisions (14)(a)(ii)(A)
through (D) of this section with a commercial presence within the state,
the producer is the person who first sells, offers for sale, or
distributes the product in or into this state.
(b) A producer does not include any person who only manufactures,
sells, offers for sale, distributes, or imports into the state a battery-
containing product if the only batteries used by the battery-containing
product are supplied by a producer that has joined a registered battery
stewardship organization as the producer for that covered battery under
the Environmental Stewardship of Batteries Act. Such a producer of
covered batteries that are included in a battery-containing product shall
provide written certification of that membership to both the producer of
the covered battery-containing product and the battery stewardship
organization of which the battery producer is a member.
(c) A person is the producer of a covered battery or covered
battery-containing product sold, offered for sale, or distributed in or
into this state, as defined in subdivision (14)(a) of this section,
except where another party has contractually accepted responsibility as a
responsible producer and has joined a registered battery stewardship
organization as the producer for that covered battery or covered battery-
containing product under the Environmental Stewardship of Batteries Act;
-14-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
(15) Program means a program implemented by a battery stewardship
organization consistent with an approved battery stewardship plan;
(16) Rechargeable battery means a battery that contains one or more
voltaic or galvanic cells, electrically connected to produce electric
energy, designed to be recharged;
(17) Recycling means transforming or remanufacturing waste materials
into usable or marketable materials for use other than:
(a) Combustion;
(b) Incineration;
(c) Energy generation;
(d) Fuel production; or
(e) Beneficial reuse in the construction and operation of a solid
waste landfill, including use of alternative daily cover;
(18) Recycling efficiency rate means the ratio of the weight of
covered battery components and materials recycled by a program operator
from covered batteries to the weight of those covered batteries collected
by the program operator;
(19) Retailer means a person who sells covered batteries or battery-
containing products in or into this state or offers or otherwise makes
available covered batteries or battery-containing products to a customer,
including other businesses, for use by the customer in this state; and
(20) Urban area means an area delineated by the United States Bureau
of the Census, based on a minimum threshold of two thousand housing units
or five thousand residents, as of January 1, 2025.
Sec. 22. Beginning January 1, 2027:
(1) Each producer selling, making available for sale, or
distributing covered batteries or battery-containing products in or into
the State of Nebraska shall participate in an approved Nebraska state
battery stewardship plan through participation in and appropriate funding
of a battery stewardship organization; and
(2) A producer that does not participate in a battery stewardship
-15-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
organization and battery stewardship plan may not sell covered batteries
or battery-containing products covered by the Environmental Stewardship
of Batteries Act in or into Nebraska.
Sec. 23. (1) Beginning July 1, 2027, for portable batteries, and
July 1, 2029, for medium format batteries, a retailer may not sell, offer
for sale, distribute, or otherwise make available for sale a covered
battery or battery-containing product unless the producer of the covered
battery or battery-containing product certifies to the retailer that the
producer participates in a battery stewardship organization whose plan
has been approved by the department.
(2) A retailer is in compliance with the requirements of subsection
(1) of this section and is not subject to penalties under section 31 of
this act as long as the website made available by the department pursuant
to section 30 of this act lists, as of the date a product is made
available for retail sale, a producer or brand of covered battery or
battery-containing product sold by the retailer as being a participant in
an approved plan or the implementer of an approved plan.
(3) Retailers of covered batteries or battery-containing products
are not required to make retail locations available to serve as
collection sites for a stewardship program operated by a battery
stewardship organization. Retailers that serve as a collection site shall
comply with the requirements for collection sites, consistent with
section 27 of this act.
(4) A retailer may not sell, offer for sale, distribute, or
otherwise make available for sale covered batteries, unless those
batteries are marked consistent with the requirements of section 33 of
this act. A producer of a battery-containing product containing a covered
battery shall certify to the retailers of their product that the battery
contained in the battery-containing product is marked consistent with the
requirements of section 33 of this act. A retailer may rely on this
certification for purposes of compliance under this subsection.
-16-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
(5) A retailer selling or offering covered batteries or battery-
containing products for sale in Nebraska may provide information,
provided to the retailer by the battery stewardship organization,
regarding available end-of-life management options for covered batteries
collected by the battery stewardship organization. The information that a
battery stewardship organization shall make available to retailers for
voluntary use by retailers shall include, but is not limited to, in-store
signage, written materials, and other promotional materials that
retailers may use to inform customers of the available end-of-life
management options for covered batteries collected by the battery
stewardship organization.
(6) Retailers, producers, or battery stewardship organizations may
not charge a specific point-of-sale fee to consumers to cover the
administrative or operational costs of the battery stewardship
organization or the battery stewardship program.
Sec. 24. (1) By July 1, 2026, or within six months after the
adoption and promulgation of rules and regulations under section 30 of
this act, whichever comes later, each battery stewardship organization
shall submit a plan for covered portable batteries to the department for
approval. Within twenty-four months after the date of the initial
adoption and promulgation of rules and regulations under the
Environmental Stewardship of Batteries Act by the department, each
battery stewardship organization shall submit a plan for covered medium
format batteries to the department for approval. A battery stewardship
organization may submit a plan at any time to the department for review
and approval. The department shall review and may approve a plan based on
whether it contains and adequately addresses the following components:
(a) Lists and provides contact information for each producer,
battery brand, and battery-containing product brand covered in the plan;
(b) Proposes performance goals, consistent with section 25 of this
act, including establishing performance goals for each of the next three
-17-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
upcoming calendar years of program implementation;
(c) Describes how the battery stewardship organization will make
retailers aware of their obligation to sell only covered batteries and
battery-containing products of producers participating in an approved
plan;
(d) Describes the education and communications strategy being
implemented to effectively promote participation in the approved covered
battery stewardship program and provide the information necessary for
effective participation of consumers, retailers, and others;
(e) Describes how the battery stewardship organization will make
available to retailers, for voluntary use, in-store signage, written
materials, and other promotional materials that retailers may use to
inform customers of the available end-of-life management options for
covered batteries collected by the battery stewardship organization;
(f) Lists promotional activities to be undertaken, and the
identification of consumer awareness goals and strategies that the
program will employ to achieve these goals after the program begins to be
implemented;
(g) Includes collection site safety training procedures related to
covered battery collection activities at collection sites, including
appropriate protocols to reduce risks of spills or fires and response
protocols in the event of a spill or fire, and a protocol for safe
management of damaged batteries that are returned to collection sites;
(h) Describes the method to establish and administer a means for
fully funding the program in a manner that equitably distributes the
program's costs among the producers that are part of the battery
stewardship organization. For producers that elect to meet the
requirements of the Environmental Stewardship of Batteries Act
individually, without joining a battery stewardship organization, the
plan shall describe the proposed method to establish and administer a
means for fully funding the program;
-18-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
(i) Describes the financing methods used to implement the plan,
consistent with section 26 of this act, including how producer fees and
fee modulation will incorporate design for recycling and resource
conservation as objectives, and a template reimbursement agreement,
developed in consultation with local governments and other program
stakeholders;
(j) Describes how the program will collect all covered battery
chemistries and brands on a free, continuous, convenient, visible, and
accessible basis, and consistent with the requirements of section 27 of
this act, including a description of how the statewide convenience
standard will be met and a list of collection sites, including the
address and latitude and longitude of collection sites;
(k) Describes the criteria to be used in the program to determine
whether an entity may serve as a collection site for discarded batteries
under the program;
(l) Establishes collection goals for each of the first three years
of implementation of the battery stewardship plan that are based on the
estimated total weight of primary and rechargeable covered batteries that
have been sold in the state in the previous three calendar years by the
producers participating in the battery stewardship plan;
(m) Identifies proposed brokers, transporters, processors, and
facilities to be used by the program for the final disposition of
batteries and how collected batteries will be managed in:
(i) An environmentally sound and socially just manner at facilities
operating with human health and environmental protection standards that
are broadly equivalent to or better than those required in the United
States and other countries that are members of the battery stewardship
organization for economic cooperation and development; and
(ii) A manner consistent with the battery management hierarchy,
including how each proposed facility used for the final disposition of
batteries will recycle or otherwise manage batteries;
-19-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
(n) Details how the program will achieve a recycling efficiency
rate, calculated consistent with section 29 of this act, of at least
sixty percent for rechargeable batteries and at least seventy percent for
primary batteries;
(o) Proposes goals for increasing public awareness of the program,
including subgoals applicable to public awareness of the program in
vulnerable populations and overburdened communities identified by the
department, and describes how the public education and outreach
components of the program under section 28 of this act will be
implemented; and
(p) Specifies procedures to be employed by a local government
seeking to coordinate with a battery stewardship organization pursuant to
subdivision (4)(c) of section 27 of this act.
(2)(a) If required by the department, a battery stewardship
organization shall submit a new plan to the department for approval:
(i) If there are significant changes to the methods of collection,
transport, or end-of-life management of covered batteries under section
28 of this act that are not provided for in the plan. The department may,
by rule and regulation, identify the types of significant changes that
require a new plan to be submitted to the department for approval;
(ii) To address the novel inclusion of medium format batteries or
large format batteries as covered batteries under the plan; and
(iii) No less than every five years.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, adding or removing a processor
or transporter under the plan is not considered a significant change that
requires a plan resubmittal.
(3) If required by the department, a battery stewardship
organization shall provide plan amendments to the department for
approval:
(a) When proposing changes to the performance goals under section 26
of this act based on the up-to-date experience of the program;
-20-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
(b) When there is a change to the method of financing plan
implementation under section 26 of this act. This does not include
changes to the fees or fee structure established in the plan; or
(c) When adding or removing a processor or transporter, as part of a
quarterly update submitted to the department.
(4) As part of a quarterly update, a battery stewardship
organization shall notify the department after a producer begins or
ceases to participate in a battery stewardship organization. The
quarterly update submitted to the department shall also include a current
list of the producers and brands participating in the plan.
(5) No earlier than five years after the initial approval of a plan,
the department may require a battery stewardship organization to submit a
revised plan, which may include improvements to the collection site
network or increased expenditures dedicated to education and outreach if
the approved plan has not met the performance goals under section 25 of
this act.
Sec. 25. (1) Each battery stewardship plan shall include
performance goals that measure, on an annual basis, the achievements of
the program. Performance goals shall take into consideration technical
feasibility and economic practicality in achieving continuous, meaningful
progress in improving:
(a) The rate of battery collection for recycling in Nebraska;
(b) The recycling efficiency of the program; and
(c) Public awareness of the program.
(2) The performance goals established in each battery stewardship
plan shall include, but are not limited to:
(a) Target collection rates;
(b) Target recycling efficiency rates of at least sixty percent for
rechargeable batteries and at least seventy percent for primary
batteries; and
(c) Goals for public awareness, convenience, and accessibility that
-21-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
meet or exceed the minimum requirements established in section 27 of this
act.
Sec. 26. (1) Each battery stewardship organization shall ensure
adequate funding is available to fully implement approved battery
stewardship plans, including the implementation of aspects of the plan
addressing:
(a) Battery collection, transporting, and processing;
(b) Education and outreach;
(c) Program evaluation; and
(d) Payment of the administrative fees to the department under
section 30 of this act.
(2) A battery stewardship organization implementing a battery
stewardship plan on behalf of producers shall develop, and continually
improve over the years of program implementation, a system to collect
charges from participating producers to cover the costs of plan
implementation in an environmentally sound and socially just manner that
encourages the use of design attributes that reduce the environmental
impacts of covered batteries, such as through the use of eco-modulated
fees. Examples of fee structures that meet the requirements of this
subsection include using eco-modulated fees to:
(a) Encourage designs intended to facilitate reuse and recycling;
(b) Encourage the use of recycled content;
(c) Discourage the use of problematic materials that increase system
costs of managing covered batteries; and
(d) Encourage other design attributes that reduce the environmental
impacts of covered batteries.
(3)(a) Except for costs incurred by a local government or local
government facility exercising the authority specified in subdivision (4)
(c) of section 27 of this act, each battery stewardship organization is
responsible for all costs of participating covered battery collection,
transportation, processing, education, administration, agency
-22-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
reimbursement, recycling, and end-of-life management in accordance with
the battery management hierarchy and environmentally sound management
practices.
(b) Each battery stewardship organization shall meet the collection
goals as specified in section 24 of this act.
(c) A battery stewardship organization is not authorized to reduce
or cease collection, education and outreach, or other activities
implemented under an approved plan based on achievement of program
performance goals.
(4)(a) Except for costs incurred by a local government or local
government facility exercising the authority granted by subdivision (4)
(c) of section 27 of this act, a battery stewardship organization shall
reimburse local governments for demonstrable costs, as defined by rules
adopted by the department, incurred as a result of a local government
facility or solid waste handling facility serving as a collection site
for a program including, but not limited to, associated labor costs and
other costs associated with accessibility and collection site standards
such as storage.
(b) Except as to the costs of containers and other materials and
services requirements addressed by a local government or local government
facility exercising the authority granted by subdivision (4)(c) of
section 27 of this act, a battery stewardship organization shall at a
minimum provide collection sites with appropriate containers for covered
batteries subject to its program, training, signage, safety guidance, and
educational materials, at no cost to the collection sites.
(c) A battery stewardship organization shall include in its battery
stewardship plan a template of the service agreement and any other forms,
contracts, or other documents for use in distribution of reimbursements.
The service agreement template shall be developed with local government
input. The entities seeking or receiving reimbursement from the battery
stewardship organization are not required to use the template agreement
-23-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
included in the program plan and are not limited to the terms of the
template agreement included in the program plan.
Sec. 27. (1) Battery stewardship organizations implementing a
battery stewardship plan shall provide for the collection of all covered
batteries, including all chemistries and brands of covered batteries, on
a free, continuous, convenient, visible, and accessible basis to any
person, business, government agency, or nonprofit organization. Except as
provided in subdivision (2)(b) of this section, each battery stewardship
plan shall allow any person, business, government agency, or nonprofit
organization to discard each chemistry and brand of covered battery at
each collection site that counts towards the satisfaction of the
collection site criteria in subsection (3) of this section.
(2)(a) Except for local government collection described in
subdivision (4)(c) of this section, for each collection site utilized by
the program, each battery stewardship organization shall provide suitable
collection containers for covered batteries that are segregated from
other solid waste or make mutually agreeable alternative arrangements for
the collection of batteries at the site. The location of collection
containers at each collection site used by the program shall be within
view of a responsible person and shall be accompanied by signage made
available to the collection site by the battery stewardship organization
that informs customers regarding the end-of-life management options for
batteries provided by the collection site under the Environmental
Stewardship of Batteries Act. Each collection site shall adhere to the
operations manual and other safety information provided to the collection
site by the battery stewardship organization.
(b) Medium format batteries may only be collected at household
hazardous waste collection sites or other sites that are staffed by
persons who are certified to handle and ship hazardous materials under
federal regulations adopted by the United States Department of
Transportation Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Administration.
-24-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
(c)(i) Damaged and defective batteries are intended to be collected
at collection sites staffed by persons trained to handle and ship those
batteries.
(ii) Each battery stewardship organization shall provide for
collection of damaged and defective batteries in each county of the
state, either through collection sites or collection events with
qualified staff as specified in subdivision (2)(c)(i) of this section.
Collection events should be provided periodically throughout the year
where practicable, but shall be provided at least once per year at a
minimum, in each county in which there are not permanent collection sites
providing for the collection of damaged and defective batteries.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, damaged and defective battery
means any battery that has been damaged or identified by the manufacturer
as being defective for safety reasons or that has the potential of
producing a dangerous evolution of heat, fire, or short circuit, as
referred to in 49 C.F.R. 173.185(f), as such regulation existed on
January 1, 2025, or as updated by the department by rule and regulation
to maintain consistency with federal standards.
(3)(a) Each battery stewardship organization implementing a battery
stewardship plan shall ensure statewide collection opportunities for all
covered batteries. Battery stewardship organizations shall coordinate
activities with other program operators, including covered battery
collection and recycle programs and electronic waste recyclers, with
regard to the proper management or recycling of collected covered
batteries, for purposes of providing the efficient delivery of services
and avoiding unnecessary duplication of effort and expense. Statewide
collection opportunities shall be determined by geographic information
modeling that considers permanent collection sites. A program may rely,
in part, on collection events to supplement the permanent collection
services required in subdivisions (3)(b) and (c) of this section.
However, only permanent collection services specified in subdivisions (3)
-25-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
(b) and (c) of this section qualify towards the satisfaction of the
requirements of this subsection.
(b) For portable batteries, each battery stewardship organization
shall provide statewide collection opportunities that include, but are
not limited to, the provision of:
(i) At least one permanent collection site for portable batteries
within a fifteen-mile radius for at least ninety percent of Nebraska
residents;
(ii) The establishment of collection sites that are accessible and
convenient to overburdened communities identified by the department, in
an amount that is roughly proportional to the number and population of
overburdened communities identified by the department relative to the
population or size of the state as a whole;
(iii) At least one permanent collection site for portable batteries
in addition to those required in subdivision (3)(b)(i) of this section
for every thirty thousand residents of each urban area in this state. For
the purposes of compliance with this subdivision (3)(b)(iii), a battery
stewardship organization and the department may rely upon new or updated
designations of urban locations by the United States Bureau of the Census
that are determined by the department to be similar to the definition of
urban area;
(iv) Collection opportunities for portable batteries at special
locations where batteries are often spent and replaced, such as
supervised locations at parks with stores and campgrounds; and
(v) Service to areas without a permanent collection site, including
service to island and geographically isolated communities without a
permanent collection site.
(c) For medium format batteries, a battery stewardship organization
shall provide statewide collection opportunities that include, but are
not limited to, the provision of:
(i) At least twenty-five permanent collection sites in Nebraska;
-26-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
(ii) Reasonable geographic dispersion of collection sites throughout
the state;
(iii) A collection site in each county of at least two hundred
thousand residents, as determined by the most recent population estimate;
(iv) The establishment of collection sites that are accessible to
public transit and that are convenient to overburdened communities
identified by the department; and
(v) Service to areas without a permanent collection site, including
service to geographically isolated communities.
(d) A battery stewardship organization shall ensure that there is a
collection site or annual collection event in each county of the state.
Collection events should be provided periodically throughout the year
where practicable, but shall be provided at least once per year at a
minimum in each county in which there are not permanent collection sites
providing for the collection of damaged and defective batteries.
(4)(a) Battery stewardship programs shall use existing public and
private waste collection services and facilities, including battery
collection sites that are established through other battery collection
services, transporters, consolidators, processors, and retailers, where
cost-effective, mutually agreeable, and otherwise practicable.
(b)(i) Battery stewardship programs shall use as a collection site
for covered batteries any retailer, wholesaler, municipality, solid waste
management facility, or other entity that meets the criteria for
collection sites in the approved plan, upon the submission of a request
by the entity to the battery stewardship organization to serve as a
collection site.
(ii) Battery stewardship programs shall use as a site for a
collection event for covered batteries any retailer, wholesaler,
municipality, solid waste management facility, or other entity that meets
the criteria for collection events in the approved plan, upon the
submission of a request by the entity to the battery stewardship
-27-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
organization to serve as a site for a collection event. A signed
agreement between a battery stewardship organization and the entity
requesting to hold a collection event shall be established at least sixty
days prior to any collection of covered batteries under a stewardship
program. All costs associated with collection events initiated by an
entity other than a battery stewardship organization are the sole
responsibility of the entity unless otherwise agreed upon by a battery
stewardship organization. A collection event under this subdivision (4)
(b)(ii) shall allow any person to discard each chemistry and brand of
covered battery at the collection event.
(c)(i) A local government facility may collect batteries at its own
expense through a collection site or temporary collection event that is
not a collection site or event under the program implemented by a battery
stewardship organization. A local government facility that collects
covered batteries under this subsection shall, in accordance with
procedures set forth in battery stewardship organization plans approved
by the department:
(A) Notify battery stewardship organizations of the local government
facility's decision to operate a collection site that is not a collection
site under a program established under the Environmental Stewardship of
Batteries Act;
(B) Collect each chemistry and brand of covered battery at its
collection site or sites;
(C) Collect, sort, and package collected materials in a manner that
meets the standards established in a battery stewardship organization
plan approved by the department;
(D) Either provide the collected batteries to the battery
stewardship organization in lawful transportation containers for it to
transfer the collected batteries at a processing facility the battery
stewardship organization has approved, or transport to or arrange for the
transportation of collected batteries for processing at a facility that a
-28-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
battery stewardship organization has approved under a plan approved by
the department.
(ii) A local government facility that collects materials at a
collection site or temporary collection event operating outside of a
battery stewardship program shall also report, to a battery stewardship
organization, information necessary for the battery stewardship
organization to fulfill its reporting obligations under section 29 of
this act. A battery stewardship organization may count materials
collected by a local government facility under this subdivision (4)(c) of
this section towards the achievement of performance requirements
established in section 25 of this act.
(d) A battery stewardship organization may suspend or terminate a
collection site or service that does not adhere to the collection site
criteria in the approved plan or that poses an immediate health and
safety concern.
(5)(a) Stewardship programs are not required to provide for the
collection of battery-containing products.
(b) Stewardship programs are not required to provide for the
collection of batteries that:
(i) Are not easily removable from the product other than by the
manufacturer; and
(ii) Remain contained in a battery-containing product at the time of
delivery to a collection site.
(c) Stewardship programs are required to provide for the collection
of loose batteries.
(6) Batteries collected by the program shall be managed consistent
with the battery management hierarchy. Lower priority end-of-life battery
management options on the battery management hierarchy may be used by a
program only when a battery stewardship organization documents to the
department that all higher priority battery management options on the
battery management hierarchy are not technologically feasible or
-29-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
economically practical.
Sec. 28. (1) Each battery stewardship organization shall carry out
promotional activities in support of plan implementation including, but
not limited to, the development:
(a) And maintenance of a website;
(b) And distribution of periodic press releases and articles;
(c) And placement of advertisements for use on social media or other
relevant media platforms;
(d) Of promotional materials about the program and the restriction
on the disposal of covered batteries in section 34 of this act to be used
by retailers, government agencies, and nonprofit organizations;
(e) And distribution of collection site safety training procedures
that are in compliance with state law to collection sites to help ensure
proper management of covered batteries at collection sites; and
(f) And implementation of outreach and educational resources
targeted to overburdened communities and vulnerable populations
identified by the department that are conceptually, linguistically, and
culturally accurate for the communities served and reach the state's
diverse ethnic populations, including through meaningful consultation
with communities that bear disproportionately higher levels of adverse
environmental and social justice impacts.
(2) Each battery stewardship organization shall provide:
(a) Consumer-focused educational promotional materials to each
collection site used by the program and accessible by customers of
retailers that sell covered batteries or battery-containing products; and
(b) Safety information related to covered battery collection
activities to the operator of each collection site, including appropriate
protocols to reduce risks of spills or fires and response protocols in
the event of a spill or fire.
(3)(a) Each battery stewardship organization shall provide
educational materials to the operator of each collection site for the
-30-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
management of recalled batteries, which are not intended to be part of
collection as provided under section 27 of this act, to help facilitate
transportation and processing of recalled batteries.
(b) A battery stewardship organization may seek reimbursement from
the producer of the recalled battery for expenses incurred in the
collection, transportation, or processing of those batteries.
(4) Upon request by a retailer, the battery stewardship organization
shall provide the retailer educational materials describing collection
opportunities for batteries.
(5) If multiple battery stewardship organizations are implementing
plans approved by the department, the battery stewardship organizations
shall coordinate in carrying out their education and outreach
responsibilities under this section and shall include in their annual
reports to the department under section 29 of this act a summary of their
coordinated education and outreach efforts.
(6) During the first year of program implementation and every five
years thereafter, each battery stewardship organization shall carry out a
survey of public awareness regarding the requirements of the program
established under the Environmental Stewardship of Batteries Act. Each
battery stewardship organization shall share the results of the public
awareness surveys with the department.
Sec. 29. (1) By June 1, 2028, and each June 1 thereafter, each
battery stewardship organization shall submit an annual report to the
department covering the preceding calendar year of battery stewardship
plan implementation. The report shall include:
(a) An independent financial assessment of a program implemented by
the battery stewardship organization, including a breakdown of the
program's expenses, such as collection, recycling, education, and
overhead, when required by the department;
(b) A summary financial statement documenting the financing of a
battery stewardship organization's program and an analysis of program
-31-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
costs and expenditures, including an analysis of the program's expenses,
such as collection, transportation, recycling, education, and
administrative overhead. The summary financial statement shall be
sufficiently detailed to provide transparency that funds collected from
producers as a result of their activities in Nebraska are spent on
program implementation in Nebraska. Battery stewardship organizations
implementing similar battery stewardship programs in multiple states may
submit a financial statement including all covered states, as long as the
statement breaks out financial information pertinent to Nebraska;
(c) The weight, by chemistry, of covered batteries collected under
the program;
(d) The weight of materials recycled from covered batteries
collected under the program, in total, and by method of battery
recycling;
(e) A calculation of the recycling efficiency rates, as measured
consistent with subsection (2) of this section;
(f) For each facility used for the final disposition of batteries, a
description of how the facility recycled or otherwise disposed of
batteries and battery components;
(g) The weight and chemistry of batteries sent to each facility used
for the final disposition of batteries. The information in this
subdivision (1)(g) may be approximated for program operations in Nebraska
based on extrapolations of national or regional data for programs in
operation in multiple states;
(h) The collection rate achieved under the program, including a
description of how this collection rate was calculated;
(i) The estimated aggregate sales, by weight and chemistry, of
batteries and batteries contained in or with battery-containing products
sold in Nebraska by participating producers for each of the previous
three calendar years;
(j) A description of the manner in which the collected batteries
-32-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
were managed and recycled, including a discussion of best available
technologies and the recycling efficiency rate;
(k) A description of education and outreach efforts supporting plan
implementation including, but not limited to, a summary of education and
outreach provided to consumers, collection sites, manufacturers,
distributors, and retailers by the program operator for the purpose of
promoting the collection and recycling of covered batteries, a
description of how that education and outreach met the requirements of
section 28 of this act, samples of education and outreach materials, a
summary of coordinated education and outreach efforts with any other
battery stewardship organizations implementing a plan approved by the
department, and a summary of any changes made during the previous
calendar year to education and outreach activities;
(l) A list of all collection sites and accompanying latitude and
longitude data and an address for each listed site, and an up-to-date map
indicating the location of all collection sites used to implement the
program, with links to appropriate websites where there are existing
websites associated with a site;
(m) A description of methods used to collect, transport, and recycle
covered batteries by the battery stewardship organization;
(n) A summary on progress made towards the program performance goals
established under section 25 of this act, and an explanation of why
performance goals were not met, if applicable; and
(o) An evaluation of the effectiveness of education and outreach
activities.
(2) The weight of batteries or recovered resources from those
batteries shall only be counted once and may not be counted by more than
one battery stewardship organization.
(3) In addition to the requirements of subsection (1) of this
section, with respect to each facility used in the processing or
disposition of batteries collected under the program, the battery
-33-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
stewardship organization shall report:
(a) Whether the facility is located domestically, in an organization
for economic cooperation and development country, or in a country that
meets organization for economic cooperation and development operating
standards; and
(b) What facilities processed the batteries, including a summary of
any violations of environmental or labor laws and regulations over the
previous three years at each facility.
(4) If a battery stewardship organization has disposed of covered
batteries though energy recovery, incineration, or landfilling during the
preceding calendar year of program implementation, the annual report
shall specify the steps that the battery stewardship organization will
take to make the recycling of covered batteries cost-effective, where
possible, or to otherwise increase battery recycling rates achieved by
the battery stewardship organization.
(5) A producer or battery stewardship organization that submits
information or records to the department under the Environmental
Stewardship of Batteries Act may request that the information or records
be made available only for the confidential use of the department, the
Director of Environment and Energy, or the appropriate division of the
department. The director shall consider the request and if this action is
not detrimental to the public interest, the director shall grant the
request for the information to remain confidential.
Sec. 30. (1) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations as necessary for the purpose of implementing, administering,
and enforcing the Environmental Stewardship of Batteries Act. The
department shall by rule and regulation establish fees, to be paid
annually by a battery stewardship organization, that are adequate to
cover the department's full costs of implementing, administering, and
enforcing the act and allocates costs between battery stewardship
organizations, if applicable. All fees shall be based on costs related to
-34-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
implementing, administering, and enforcing the act, not to exceed
expenses incurred by the department for these activities.
(2) The responsibilities of the department in implementing,
administering, and enforcing the Environmental Stewardship of Batteries
Act include, but are not limited to:
(a)(i) Reviewing submitted stewardship plans and plan amendments and
making determinations as to whether to approve the plan or plan
amendment.
(ii) The department shall provide a letter of approval for the plan
or plan amendment if it provides for the establishment of a stewardship
program that meets the requirements of sections 22 to 28 of this act.
(iii) If a plan or plan amendment is rejected, the department shall
provide the reasons for rejecting the plan to the battery stewardship
organization. The battery stewardship organization shall submit a new
plan within sixty days after receipt of the letter of disapproval.
(iv) When a plan or an amendment to an approved plan is submitted
under this section, the department shall make the proposed plan or
amendment available for public review and comment for at least thirty
days;
(b) Reviewing annual reports submitted under section 29 of this act
within ninety days after submission to ensure compliance with such
section;
(c)(i) Maintaining a website that lists producers and their brands
that are participating in an approved plan, and that makes available to
the public each plan, plan amendment, and annual report received by the
department under the Environmental Stewardship of Batteries Act.
(ii) Upon the date the first plan is approved, the department shall
post on its website a list of producers and their brands for which the
department has approved a plan. The department shall update the list of
producers and brands participating under an approved program plan based
on information provided to the department from battery stewardship
-35-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
organizations; and
(d) Providing technical assistance to producers and retailers
related to the requirements of the Environmental Stewardship of Batteries
Act and issuing orders or imposing civil penalties authorized under
section 31 of this act if the technical assistance efforts do not lead to
compliance by a producer or retailer.
(3) Beginning January 1, 2032, and every five years thereafter,
after consultation with battery stewardship organizations, the department
may by rule and regulation increase the minimum recycling efficiency
rates established in section 25 of this act based on the most
economically and technically feasible processes and methodology
available.
Sec. 31. (1)(a) A battery stewardship organization implementing an
approved plan may bring a civil action or actions to recover costs,
damages, and fees, as specified in this section, from a producer who
sells or otherwise makes available in Nebraska covered batteries or
battery-containing products not included in an approved plan in violation
of the requirements of the Environmental Stewardship of Batteries Act. An
action under this section may be brought against one or more defendants.
An action may only be brought against a defendant producer when the
stewardship program incurs costs in Nebraska, including reasonable
incremental administrative and program promotional costs, in excess of
one thousand dollars to collect, transport, and recycle or otherwise
dispose of the covered batteries or battery-containing products of a
nonparticipating producer.
(b) A battery stewardship organization may bring a civil action
against a producer of a recalled battery to recover costs associated with
handling a recalled battery.
(c) A battery stewardship organization implementing an approved
stewardship plan may bring a civil action against another battery
stewardship organization that under-performs on its battery collection
-36-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
obligations under the Environmental Stewardship of Batteries Act by
failing to collect and provide for the end-of-life management of
batteries in an amount roughly equivalent to costs imposed on the
plaintiff battery stewardship organization by virtue of the failures of
the defendants, plus attorney's fees and expenses.
(d) The remedies provided in this subsection are in addition to the
enforcement authority of the department and do not limit and are not
limited by a decision by the department to impose a civil penalty or
issue an order under subsection (2) of this section. The department is
not required to audit, participate in, or provide assistance to a battery
stewardship organization pursuing a civil action authorized under this
subsection.
(2)(a) The department may administratively impose a civil penalty on
a person who violates the Environmental Stewardship of Batteries Act in
an amount of up to one thousand dollars per violation per day.
(b) The department may administratively impose a civil penalty of up
to ten thousand dollars per violation per day on a person for repeated
violations of the Environmental Stewardship of Batteries Act or failure
to comply with an order issued under subdivision (c) of this subsection.
(c) Whenever, on the basis of any information, the department
determines that a person has violated or is in violation of the
Environmental Stewardship of Batteries Act, the department may issue an
order requiring compliance. A person who fails to take corrective action
as specified in a compliance order is liable for a civil penalty as
provided in subdivision (b) of this subsection, without receiving a
written warning prescribed in subdivision (e) of this subsection.
(d) A person who is issued an order or incurs a penalty under this
section may appeal the order or penalty to the department.
(e) Prior to imposing penalties under this section, the department
shall provide a producer, retailer, or battery stewardship organization
with a written warning for the first violation by the producer, retailer,
-37-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
or battery stewardship organization of the requirements of the
Environmental Stewardship of Batteries Act. The written warning shall
inform a producer, retailer, or battery stewardship organization that it
shall participate in an approved plan or otherwise come into compliance
with the requirements of the act within thirty days after the notice. A
producer, retailer, or battery stewardship organization that violates the
act after the initial written warning may be assessed a penalty as
provided in this subsection.
(3) No penalty may be assessed on an individual or resident for the
improper disposal of covered batteries as described in section 34 of this
act in a noncommercial or residential setting.
(4) Civil penalties collected under this section shall be remitted
to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII,
section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
Sec. 32. The Responsible Battery Management Fund is created. The
fund shall consist of all receipts from fees paid under the Environmental
Stewardship of Batteries Act. Only the Director of Environment and Energy
or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the fund.
Money in the fund may be used solely by the department for administering,
implementing, and enforcing the requirements of the act. Any money in the
fund may not be diverted for any purpose or activity other than those
specified in this section. Any money in the fund available for investment
shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.
Sec. 33. (1) Beginning January 1, 2028, a producer or retailer may
only sell, distribute, or offer for sale in or into Nebraska a large
format battery, covered battery, or battery-containing product that
contains a battery that is designed or intended to be easily removable
from the product, if the battery is:
(a) Marked with an identification of the producer of the battery,
-38-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
unless the battery is less than one-half inch in diameter or does not
contain a surface whose length exceeds one-half inch; and
(b) Beginning January 1, 2030, marked with proper labeling to ensure
proper collection and recycling, by identifying the chemistry of the
battery and including an indication that the battery should not be
disposed of as household waste.
(2) A producer shall certify to its customers, or to the retailer if
the retailer is not the customer, that the requirements of this section
have been met, as provided in section 23 of this act.
(3) The department may amend, by rule and regulation, the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section to maintain consistency
with the labeling requirements or voluntary standards for batteries
established in federal law.
Sec. 34. (1) Beginning on July 1, 2027, for portable batteries, and
on July 1, 2029, for medium format batteries, or beginning on the first
date on which an approved plan begins to be implemented under the
Environmental Stewardship of Batteries Act by a battery stewardship
organization, whichever comes first, all persons shall dispose of
unwanted covered batteries through one of the following disposal options:
(a) Disposal using the collection sites established by or included
in the programs created by the act;
(b) For covered batteries generated by persons that are regulated
generators of covered batteries under federal or state hazardous or solid
waste laws, disposal in a manner consistent with the requirements of
those laws; or
(c) Disposal using local government collection facilities that
collect batteries consistent with subdivision (4)(c) of section 27 of
this act.
(2)(a) A fee may not be charged at the time unwanted covered
batteries are delivered or collected for management.
(b) All covered batteries may only be collected, transported, and
-39-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
processed in a manner that meets the standards established for a battery
stewardship organization in a plan approved by the department, unless the
batteries are being managed as described in subdivision (1)(b) of this
section.
(3) A person may not place covered batteries in waste containers for
disposal at incinerators, waste-to-energy facilities, or landfills.
(4) A person may not place covered batteries in or on a container
for mixed recyclables unless there is a separate location or compartment
for the covered battery that complies with local government collection
standards or guidelines.
(5) An owner or operator of a solid waste facility may not be found
in violation of this section if the facility has posted in a conspicuous
location a sign stating that covered batteries shall be managed through
collection sites established by a battery stewardship organization and
are not accepted for disposal.
(6) A solid waste collector may not be found in violation of this
section for a covered battery placed in a disposal container by the
generator of the covered battery.
Sec. 35. (1) By July 1, 2027, the department shall complete an
assessment of the opportunities and challenges associated with the end-
of-life management of batteries that are not covered batteries,
including:
(a) Large format batteries;
(b) Lead acid batteries that weigh greater than eleven pounds;
(c) Batteries contained in medical devices, as specified in 21
U.S.C. 360c, as such section existed on January 1, 2025, that are not
designed and marketed for sale or resale principally to consumers for
personal use; and
(d) Batteries not intended or designed to be easily removed by a
customer that are contained in battery-containing products, including
medical devices.
-40-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
(2) The department shall consult with interested stakeholders in
completing the assessment, including consultation with overburdened
communities and vulnerable populations identified by the department. The
assessment shall identify any needed adjustments to the stewardship
program requirements established in the Environmental Stewardship of
Batteries Act that are necessary to maximize public health, safety, and
environmental benefits, such as battery reuse.
(3) The assessment shall consider:
(a) The different categories and uses of batteries and battery-
containing products listed in subsection (1) of this section;
(b) The current economic value and reuse or recycling potential of
large format batteries or large format battery components and a summary
of studies examining the environmental and equity implications of
displacing demand for new rare earth materials, critical materials, and
other conflict materials through the reuse and recycling of batteries;
(c) The current methods by which unwanted batteries and battery-
containing products listed in subsection (1) of this section are managed
in Nebraska and nearby states;
(d) Challenges posed by the potential collection, management, and
transport of batteries and battery-containing products listed in
subsection (1) of this section, including challenges associated with
removing batteries that were not intended or designed to be easily
removable from products, other than by the manufacturer; and
(e) Which criteria of the act should apply to batteries and battery-
containing products listed in subsection (1) of this section in a manner
that is identical or analogous to the requirements applicable to covered
batteries.
(4) By October 1, 2027, the department shall submit a report
electronically to the Legislature containing the findings of the
assessment required in this section.
Sec. 36. Producers or battery stewardship organizations acting on
-41-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
behalf of producers that prepare, submit, and implement a battery
stewardship program plan pursuant to the Environmental Stewardship of
Batteries Act and who are thereby subject to regulation by the department
are granted immunity from state laws relating to antitrust, restraint of
trade, unfair trade practices, and other regulation of trade and
commerce, for the limited purpose of planning, reporting, and operating a
battery stewardship program, including:
(1) The creation, implementation, or management of a battery
stewardship organization and any battery stewardship plan regardless of
whether it is submitted, denied, or approved;
(2) The determination of the cost and structure of a battery
stewardship plan; and
(3) The types or quantities of batteries being recycled or otherwise
managed pursuant to the act.
Sec. 37. Nothing in the Environmental Stewardship of Batteries Act
changes or limits the authority of a city or village to provide for the
collection of solid waste, including curbside collection of residential
recyclable materials.
Sec. 38. Sections 38 to 41 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Extended Producer Responsibility Data Collection Act.
Sec. 39. For purposes of the Extended Producer Responsibility Data
Collection Act:
(1) Covered product means packaging and paper products sold or
supplied to consumers for personal, noncommercial use and disposed of
through residential curbside or drop-off site collection systems;
(2) Department means the Department of Environment and Energy; and
(3)(a) Producer means the following person responsible for
compliance with requirements under the act for a covered material
introduced:
(i) For items sold in or with packaging at a physical retail
location in this state:
-42-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
(A) If the item is sold in or with packaging under the brand of the
item manufacturer or is sold in packaging that lacks identification of a
brand, the producer is the person that manufactures the item;
(B) If there is no person to which subdivision (3)(a)(i)(A) of this
section applies, the producer is the person that is licensed to
manufacture and sell or offer for sale to consumers in this state an item
with packaging under the brand or trademark of another manufacturer or
person;
(C) If there is no person to which subdivision (3)(a)(i)(A) or (B)
of this section applies, the producer is the brand owner of the item;
(D) If there is no person described in subdivision (3)(a)(i)(A),
(B), or (C) of this section within the United States, the producer is the
person who is the importer of record for the item into the United States
for use in a commercial enterprise that sells, offers for sale, or
distributes the item in this state; or
(E) If there is no person described in subdivisions (3)(a)(i)(A)
through (D) of this section, the producer is the person that first
distributes the item in or into this state;
(ii) For items sold or distributed in packaging in or into this
state via e-commerce, remote sale, or distribution:
(A) For packaging used to directly protect or contain the item, the
producer of the packaging is the same as the producer identified under
subdivision (3)(a)(i) of this section; and
(B) For packaging used to ship the item to a consumer, the producer
of the packaging is the person that packages the item to be shipped to
the consumer;
(iii) For packaging that is a covered material and is not included
in subdivisions (3)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section, the producer of the
packaging is the person that first distributes the item in or into this
state;
(iv) For paper products that are magazines, catalogs, telephone
-43-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
directories, or similar publications, the producer is the publisher;
(v) For paper products not described in subdivision (3)(a)(iv) of
this section:
(A) If the paper product is sold under the manufacturer's own brand,
the producer is the person that manufactures the paper product;
(B) If there is no person to which subdivision (3)(a)(v)(A) of this
section applies, the producer is the person that is the owner or licensee
of a brand or trademark under which the paper product is used in a
commercial enterprise, sold, offered for sale, or distributed in or into
this state, whether or not the trademark is registered in this state;
(C) If there is no person to which subdivision (3)(a)(v)(A) or (B)
of this section applies, the producer is the brand owner of the paper
product;
(D) If there is no person described in subdivision (3)(a)(v)(A),
(B), or (C) of this section within the United States, the producer is the
person that imports the paper product into the United States for use in a
commercial enterprise that sells, offers for sale, or distributes the
paper product in this state; or
(E) If there is no person described in subdivisions (3)(a)(v)(A)
through (D) of this section, the producer is the person that first
distributes the paper product in or into this state; and
(vi) A person is the producer of a covered material sold, offered
for sale, or distributed in or into this state, as defined in
subdivisions (3)(a)(i) through (v) of this section, except:
(A) Where another person has mutually signed an agreement with a
producer as defined in subdivisions (3)(a)(i) through (v) of this section
that contractually assigns responsibility to the person as the producer,
and the person has joined a registered producer responsibility
organization as the responsible producer for that covered material under
the Extended Producer Responsibility Data Collection Act. In the event
that another person is assigned responsibility as the producer under this
-44-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
subdivision (3)(a)(vi), the producer under subdivisions (3)(a)(i) through
(v) of this section shall provide written certification of that
contractual agreement to the producer responsibility organization; and
(B) If the producer described in subdivisions (3)(a)(i) through (v)
of this section is a business operated wholly or in part as a franchise,
the producer is the franchisor if that franchisor has franchisees that
have a commercial presence within the state.
(b) Producer does not include:
(i) Government agencies, municipalities, or other political
subdivisions of the state;
(ii) Charitable organizations described in section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code as defined in section 49-801.01 and social welfare
organizations described in section 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code
as defined in section 49-801.01; or
(iii) De minimis producers that:
(A) Annually sell, offer for sale, distribute, or import in or into
the country for sale in Nebraska less than one ton of covered products
each year; or
(B) Have a global gross revenue of less than five million dollars
for the most recent fiscal year of the organization. The department shall
calculate an adjusted rate to maintain the de minimis exemption by the
rate of inflation. The adjusted rate shall be calculated to the nearest
cent using the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Wage Earners. Each
adjusted rate calculated under this subdivision takes effect on the
following January 1.
Sec. 40. (1) Beginning January 1, 2026, a producer that offers for
sale, sells, or distributes in or into Nebraska covered products shall
register with the department individually or through a third-party
representative registering on behalf of a group of producers.
(2) The registration information submitted to the department under
this section shall include a list of the producers of covered products
-45-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
and the brand names of the covered products represented in the
registration submittal. Beginning in 2027, a producer may submit
registration information at the same time as the information submitted
through the annual reporting in subsection (3) of this section.
(3)(a) Beginning April 1, 2027, each producer of covered products,
individually or through a third party representing a group of producers,
shall provide an annual report to the department that includes, by
material category, the volume in pounds of covered products sold, offered
for sale, or distributed in or into Nebraska during the preceding
calendar year.
(b) The report shall be submitted in a format and manner prescribed
by the department. A manufacturer may submit national data allocated on a
per capita basis for Nebraska to approximate the information required in
this subsection if the producer or third-party representative
demonstrates to the department that state-level data is not available or
feasible to generate.
(c) The department shall post the information reported under this
subsection on its website, except as provided in subdivision (d) of this
subsection.
(d) A producer that submits information or records to the department
under the Extended Producer Responsibility Data Collection Act may
request that the information or records be made available only for the
confidential use of the department, the Director of Environment and
Energy, or the appropriate division of the department. The director shall
give consideration to the request, and if this action is not detrimental
to the public interest, the director shall grant the request for the
information.
Sec. 41. (1) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations as necessary to administer, implement, and enforce the
Extended Producer Responsibility Data Collection Act.
(2)(a) The department may conduct audits and investigations for the
-46-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
purpose of ensuring compliance with the act.
(b) The department shall annually publish a list of registered
producers of covered products and associated brand names, their
compliance status, and other information the department deems appropriate
on the department's website.
(3)(a) By January 31, 2026, and every January 31 thereafter, the
department shall prepare an annual workload analysis for public comment
that identifies the annual costs it expects to incur to implement,
administer, enforce, and carry out the Extended Producer Responsibility
Data Collection Act.
(b) By April 1, 2026, and every April 1 thereafter, producers shall
submit a fee payment of one thousand dollars. Fee payments shall be
deposited in the Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive Fund.
(c) The department may adjust the fee prescribed in subdivision (b)
of this subsection as needed to cover its costs.
(d) The department may set a single fee for third-party
representatives of producers to be paid on behalf of all producers which
are members.
(e) The department shall:
(i) Apply any remaining annual payment funds from the current year
to the annual payment for the coming year, if the collected annual
payment exceeds the department's costs for a given year; and
(ii) Increase annual payments for the coming year to cover the
department's costs, if the collected annual payment was less than the
department's costs for a given year.
(4) For producers out of compliance with the registration or
reporting requirements of the Extended Producer Responsibility Data
Collection Act, the department shall provide written notification and
offer information to producers. For purposes of this section, written
notification serves as notice of the violation. The department shall
issue at least two notices of violation by certified mail prior to
-47-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
assessing a penalty under subsection (5) of this section.
(5) The department may assess a penalty in an amount not to exceed
one thousand dollars for each day for a violation of the Extended
Producer Responsibility Data Collection Act.
(6) Penalties issued under this section are appealable to the
Environmental Quality Council.
(7) Penalties collected under this section shall be remitted to the
State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section
5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
Sec. 42. Sections 42 to 58 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Minimum Recycled Content Act.
Sec. 43. For purposes of the Minimum Recycled Content Act:
(1) Covered product means covered product as described in section 44
of this act;
(2) De minimis manufacturer means a person that annually sells,
offers for sale, distributes, or imports into the country for sale in the
state:
(a) Less than one ton of a single category of recycled content
products; or
(b) A single category of a covered product that, in aggregate,
generates less than five million dollars each year in global revenue;
(3) Department means the Department of Environment and Energy;
(4) Food means articles used for food or drink for consumption by
humans or other animals, and articles used for components of any such
article;
(5) Hazardous waste means any solid waste defined as hazardous waste
by the department;
(6) Licensee means a manufacturer or entity who licenses a brand and
manufactures a covered product under that brand;
(7)(a) Manufacturer means:
(i) A person that produces or generates a covered product that is
-48-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
sold or offered for sale in the state;
(ii) A person that is the brand owner of a covered product that is
sold or offered for sale in the state unless the brand owner identifies a
licensee who agrees to accept responsibility under the Minimum Recycled
Content Act and the licensee informs the department in writing of the
agreement; or
(iii) In the absence of a person meeting the criteria in subdivision
(6)(a)(i) or (ii) of this section over whom the state may exercise
jurisdiction, a person who imports or distributes a covered product into
or within the state.
(b) Manufacturer does not include:
(i) A person who only licenses a brand or trademark for a product
and does not produce, package, or sell the product in the state, except
as agreed upon pursuant to subdivision (6)(a)(ii) of this section;
(ii) A person who, at a single physical location, produces,
packages, and sells a product directly to a consumer at retail, which may
include a grocery store, restaurant, bar, cafeteria, café, food truck,
food cart, or similar establishment; or
(iii) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Minimum Recycled
Content Act to the contrary, a de minimis manufacturer;
(8) Person means an individual, corporation, company, association,
society, firm, partnership, or joint stock company;
(9)(a) Plastic means a synthetic material made from linking monomers
through a chemical reaction to create an organic polymer chain that can
be molded or extruded at high heat into various solid forms retaining
their defined shapes during the life cycle and after disposal.
(b) Plastic does not include material that is designed to be
composted in a municipal or industrial aerobic composting facility and
that is certified by a recognized third-party independent verification
body as meeting the standards therefore established by ASTM International
publications D6400 or D6868;
-49-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
(10) Plastic trash bag means a bag that is made of plastic, is at
least 0.7 mils thick, and is designed and manufactured for use as a
container to hold, store, or transport materials to be discarded,
composted, or recycled, and includes, but is not limited to, a garbage
bag, lawn or leaf bag, can-liner bag, kitchen bag, or compactor bag;
(11) Portfolio means the suite of product sub-types with the same
primary resin composition that a manufacturer may produce under a single
covered product type as listed in section 44 of this act;
(12) Portfolio standard means a standard for calculating average
postconsumer recycled content across covered product sub-types provided
that all covered recycled content products in a manufacturer's portfolio
are accounted for in the calculation;
(13)(a) Postconsumer recycled content means material generated by
households or by commercial, industrial, and institutional facilities in
their role as end-users of the product which has been used for its
intended use or can no longer be used for its intended purpose. This
includes the return of material from the distribution chain.
(b) Postconsumer recycled content does not include secondary waste
material or materials and byproducts generated from, and commonly used
within, an original manufacturing and fabrication process;
(14) Recycled content product means all products listed under
subsection (1) of section 44 of this act;
(15) Refillable container means a rigid plastic container that is
routinely returned to and refilled by the manufacturer with the same
product packaged by the container;
(16) Representative organization means an organization created or
selected by a manufacturer or manufacturers for the purposes of complying
with the annual registration and reporting requirements described in
sections 48 and 51 of this act;
(17) Reusable container means a rigid plastic container that is
routinely reused by consumers to store the original product packaged by
-50-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
the container; and
(18) Rigid plastic container means a container made of plastic that
has a relatively inflexible finite shape or form, has a minimum capacity
of eight fluid ounces or its equivalent volume, and is capable of
maintaining its shape while empty or while holding other products.
Sec. 44. (1) For purposes of the Minimum Recycled Content Act,
covered product includes:
(a) Rigid plastic containers;
(b) Rigid plastic products used for:
(i) Plastic buckets and pails;
(ii) Household storage containers;
(iii) Indoor trash bins;
(iv) Nursery packaging;
(v) Trash and recycling carts; and
(vi) Secondary packaging such as crates, totes, and gaylords;
(c) Plastic trash bags; and
(d) Film plastic used as:
(i) Packaging overwrap;
(ii) Lawn and garden plastic film bags; and
(iii) Heavy duty industrial plastic film bags.
(2)(a) The department is hereby authorized to issue guidance related
to covered recycled content product definitions as needed.
(b) Covered recycled content products shall be exempt from the
Minimum Recycled Content Act if any of the following conditions apply:
(i) The product is a package or container that contains food;
(ii) The product is associated with a product produced in or brought
into the state that is destined for shipment to a destination outside the
state, and that remains with the product upon shipment;
(iii) The product contains drugs, dietary supplements, medical
devices, or cosmetics as those terms are defined in the Federal Food,
Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. 301 et seq., as such act existed on
-51-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
January 1, 2025;
(iv) The product contains toxic or hazardous products regulated
under the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, 7 U.S.C.
136 et seq., as such act existed on January 1, 2025;
(v) The product is manufactured for use in the shipment of hazardous
materials and is:
(A) Prohibited from being manufactured with used material by federal
packaging material specifications set forth in 49 C.F.R. 178.509 and 49
C.F.R. 178.522;
(B) Is subject to the testing standards set forth in 49 C.F.R.
178.600 through 49 C.F.R. 178.609; or
(C) Is subject to the recommendations of the United Nations on the
transport of dangerous goods; or
(vi) The product is a refillable container or a reusable container.
Sec. 45. (1) A manufacturer of a covered product shall meet the
following annual minimum postconsumer recycled content percentages on
average for the total quantity of covered recycled content products, by
weight, that are sold, offered for sale, or distributed in or into the
state:
(a) Beginning January 1, 2028, for covered recycled content
products, no less than thirty percent postconsumer recycled content
plastic by weight; and
(b) Beginning January 1, 2028, for trash and recycling carts, no
less than ten percent postconsumer recycled content plastic by weight.
(2) This section does not apply to:
(a) Containers certified by the Biodegradable Products Institute as
compostable;
(b) A bag that is designed and manufactured to hold, store, or
transport hazardous waste or regulated medical waste; and
(c) Other items as designated by the department.
Sec. 46. (1) A manufacturer shall achieve compliance with the
-52-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
postconsumer recycled content requirements of the Minimum Recycled
Content Act based on the average amount of postconsumer recycled content,
by weight, contained in its covered recycled content products. A
manufacturer may calculate the average amount of postconsumer recycled
content contained in its products using data specific to products sold or
offered for sale in the state or nationwide. Beginning four years after
the operative date of this act, a manufacturer shall calculate the
average amount of postconsumer recycled content in its products using
data specific to products sold or offered for sale in this state only, if
such data is available. If a manufacturer demonstrates to the department
that state-specific data is not available or feasible to generate, then
the manufacturer may utilize national data to calculate the average
amount of postconsumer recycled content contained in its products.
(2) The calculation of averages may be based on portfolio standards.
Beginning five years after the effective date of each postconsumer
content requirement described in this section, a manufacturer shall be
required to calculate the amount of postconsumer recycled content in each
individual covered product sold or offered for sale within the state.
(3) If a manufacturer relies on national data to calculate the
average amount of postconsumer recycled content contained in its
products, the manufacturer shall:
(a) Prorate the national data based on market share or population,
to ensure that the percentage of postconsumer recycled content calculated
for products sold in the state is the same percentage as calculated for
the nation; and
(b) Document the methodology used to prorate the national data in
the report required pursuant to this section.
Sec. 47. (1) A manufacturer may apply to the department for a
temporary waiver or an extended timeline for compliance from the
postconsumer recycled content requirements established pursuant to the
Minimum Recycled Content Act. The department may grant a waiver pursuant
-53-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
to this subsection if the manufacturer demonstrates, and the department
finds that:
(a) The manufacturer cannot achieve the postconsumer recycled
content requirements and remain in compliance with applicable regulations
adopted by the United States Food and Drug Administration, or any other
state or federal law, rule, or regulation;
(b) It is not technologically feasible for the manufacturer to
achieve the postconsumer recycled content requirements;
(c) The manufacturer cannot comply with the postconsumer recycled
content requirements due to supply limitations; or
(d) The manufacturer cannot comply for another reason as determined
by the department pursuant to rules and regulations based on factors
described in section 50 of this act.
(2) In order to qualify for a waiver from the postconsumer recycled
content requirements of the Minimum Recycled Content Act, a manufacturer
shall submit to the department documentation from a federal or state
agency or certified third-party expert, as appropriate, demonstrating
that the manufacturer cannot comply with the postconsumer recycled
content requirements for one of the reasons set forth in subsection (1)
of this section, and pay a waiver fee of one thousand dollars. The
department may modify the amount of the waiver fee, pursuant to the
Administrative Procedure Act, as necessary to reflect the department's
costs to administer, monitor, and enforce this section.
(3) The department may grant a waiver from the postconsumer recycled
content requirements for a period of not less than two years, as
determined by the department. The department shall publish any
determination to grant a waiver from the postconsumer recycled content
requirements on its website. The department shall develop a standardized
form and procedure for manufacturers to apply for a waiver pursuant to
this section.
Sec. 48. (1) Beginning three years after the operative date of this
-54-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
act, and annually thereafter, a manufacturer shall, individually or as
part of a representative organization, register with the department in a
form and manner as prescribed by the department, and pay an annual
registration fee of one thousand dollars.
(2) The department may modify the amount of the annual registration
fee, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, as necessary to
reflect the department's costs to implement, administer, monitor, and
enforce the Minimum Recycled Content Act.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the
contrary:
(a) A de minimis manufacturer shall not be required to pay the
registration fee established pursuant to this section if the manufacturer
demonstrates to the department and the department finds that, upon annual
registration, the manufacturer is a de minimis manufacturer; or
(b) A manufacturer that produces or generates only products that are
exempt from the Minimum Recycled Content Act shall be required to
register with the department only once and shall be exempt from the
registration fee.
(4)(a) The department shall establish an electronic registration
process on its website.
(b) The lack of an electronic registration process shall not negate
the requirement for a manufacturer to register pursuant to this section.
(5) The registration shall include information regarding:
(a) Each producer included under the registration;
(b) Each brand name of a covered product included under the
registration;
(c) The total weight of covered recycled content products sold in
the state in the immediately preceding calendar year, including the total
weight by each category of a covered product;
(d) The average percentage of postconsumer recycled content for each
category of a covered product sold in the state in the immediately
-55-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
preceding calendar year;
(e) Proof of third-party certification in accordance with this
section; and
(f) Any additional information required by the department by rule
and regulation.
(6) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the
contrary, a manufacturer that fails to register with the department
pursuant to this section shall first receive a written warning. A
manufacturer that receives a written warning shall register with the
department no later than ninety days after receipt of the warning.
(7) A manufacturer that receives a written warning and that fails to
register with the department within ninety days after receipt of the
warning shall be subject to the penalties set forth in section 55 of this
act.
Sec. 49. (1) Beginning January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, a
producer shall include proof of third-party certification of the
postconsumer recycled content of each covered product included in the
registration in a manner required by the department.
(2) The certification required under subsection (1) of this section
shall be completed by an independent, accredited certifying body as
required by the International Organization for Standardization.
Sec. 50. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Minimum
Recycled Content Act to the contrary, the department may, at any time,
pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, review and adjust any of
the postconsumer recycled content requirements established in the act.
(2) In making an adjustment pursuant to this section, the department
shall consider:
(a) Changes in market conditions, including supply and demand for
postconsumer recycled content, collection rates, and bale availability
both domestically and globally;
(b) Recycling rates, as may be determined by the department;
-56-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
(c) The availability of recycled material suitable for manufacturers
to meet the postconsumer recycled content requirements, including the
availability of high-quality recycled plastic and food-grade recycled
plastic;
(d) The capacity of recycling or processing infrastructure;
(e) The progress made by manufacturers in meeting the postconsumer
recycled content requirements; and
(f) Any other factors as determined by the department pursuant to
rule and regulation.
(3) Any adjustment to the postconsumer recycled content requirements
made pursuant to this section shall be only for a time period, and only
under such conditions, as the department may by rule and regulation
establish.
Sec. 51. (1) Beginning January 1, 2027, a manufacturer shall,
individually or as part of a representative organization, provide an
annual report to the department that includes the amount, in pounds, of
virgin plastic by resin type, and the amount, in pounds, of postconsumer
recycled content by resin type used and the source, by country of origin,
for each category of covered recycled content products that are sold,
offered for sale, or distributed in or into the state, including the
total postconsumer recycled content resins as a percentage of total
plastic weight.
(2) The report shall be submitted in a format and manner prescribed
by the department.
(3) The department shall post the information reported under this
section on its website, except as provided in subsection (4) of this
section.
(4) A producer that submits information or records to the department
under the Minimum Recycled Content Act may request that the information
or records be made available only for the confidential use of the
department, the Director of Environment and Energy, or the appropriate
-57-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
division of the department. The director shall give consideration to the
request, and if this action is not detrimental to the public interest,
the director shall grant the request for the information to remain
confidential.
Sec. 52. The department may participate in the establishment and
implementation of a multistate clearinghouse to assist in carrying out
the requirements of the Minimum Recycled Content Act, including to:
(1) Help coordinate the review of registrations, waiver requests,
and certifications described in the act; and
(2) Implement education and outreach activities.
Sec. 53. (1) With respect to violations related to the amount of
recycled content contained in a manufacturer's covered recycled content
products, the department shall assess a civil penalty on a per-pound
basis for each pound of virgin material that is used by a manufacturer in
its products where recycled material is required pursuant to the Minimum
Recycled Content Act. The penalty shall be set at twenty cents per pound
for the first year.
(2) After January 1, 2029, the department may develop a formula and
methodology for calculating a per-pound penalty for each resin type that
is, over the average of the previous six months, greater than the market
price differential between postconsumer resin and virgin resin varieties
according to one or more national price indices as selected by the
department.
(3) Civil penalties collected under this section shall be remitted
to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII,
section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
Sec. 54. (1) The department may grant a reduction in the civil
penalties imposed under section 53 of this act if a producer submits to
the department a corrective action plan and the department approves the
corrective action plan.
(2) A corrective action plan submitted under this section shall
-58-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
include:
(a) The reasons the producer will fail to meet or failed to meet the
minimum postconsumer recycled content percentage requirements; and
(b) The steps that the producer will take to comply with the
requirements during the subsequent reporting years.
(3) In determining whether to grant a reduction in the civil
penalties, the department shall consider:
(a) Anomalous market conditions;
(b) Disruption in supply or lack of supply of recycled plastics;
(c) Efforts undertaken by the producer to increase the recyclability
of the producer's product and the supply of postconsumer recycled
plastic;
(d) Efforts taken to increase the use of postconsumer recycled
plastics in other applications; and
(e) Other factors that prevent a producer from meeting the minimum
postconsumer recycled content percentage requirements.
Sec. 55. (1) For manufacturers that are out of compliance with the
registration or reporting requirements of sections 48 and 51 of this act,
the department shall provide written notification and offer information
to producers. For purposes of this section, written notification serves
as notice of the violation. The department shall issue at least two
notices of violation by certified mail prior to assessing a penalty under
subsection (2) of this section.
(2) A manufacturer out of compliance with the registration or
reporting requirements of sections 48 and 51 of this act is subject to a
civil penalty for each day of violation in an amount not to exceed one
thousand dollars.
Sec. 56. For each pound of postconsumer resin purchased from a
source in this state or in adjacent regions, as determined by the
department, for use in the manufacture of covered recycled content
products with recycled plastic postconsumer material in compliance with
-59-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
the Minimum Recycled Content Act, the department shall credit the
certifying manufacturer with having used one and two-tenths pounds of
postconsumer resin toward compliance with the requirements of the act.
Sec. 57. Civil penalties collected under the Minimum Recycled
Content Act shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for distribution in
accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
Sec. 58. The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out the Minimum Recycled Content Act.
Sec. 59. Section 81-1502, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1502 For purposes of the Environmental Protection Act, unless the
context otherwise requires:
(1) Air contaminant or air contamination means shall mean the
presence in the outdoor atmosphere of any dust, fume, mist, smoke, vapor,
gas, other gaseous fluid, or particulate substance differing in
composition from or exceeding in concentration the natural components of
the atmosphere;
(2) Air pollution means shall mean the presence in the outdoor
atmosphere of one or more air contaminants or combinations thereof in
such quantities and of such duration as are or may tend to be injurious
to human, plant, or animal life, property, or the conduct of business;
(3) Chairperson means shall mean the chairperson of the
Environmental Quality Council and council means shall mean the
Environmental Quality Council;
(4) Complaint means shall mean any charge, however informal, to or
by the council, that any person or agency, private or public, is
polluting the air, land, or water or is violating the Environmental
Protection Act or any rule or regulation of the department in respect
thereof;
(5) Control and controlling includes shall include prohibition and
prohibiting as related to air, land, or water pollution;
-60-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
(6) Department means shall mean the Department of Environment and
Energy, which department is hereby created;
(7) Director means shall mean the Director of Environment and
Energy, which position is hereby established;
(8) Disposal system means shall mean a system for disposing of
wastes, including hazardous wastes, either by surface or underground
methods, and includes sewerage systems and treatment works, disposal
wells and fields, and other systems;
(9) Effluent limitation means any restriction, including a schedule
of compliance, established by the council on quantities, rates, and
concentrations of chemical, physical, biological, and other constituents
which are discharged from point sources into waters of the state;
(10) (9) Emissions means shall mean releases or discharges into the
outdoor atmosphere of any air contaminant or combination thereof;
(11) Fluid means a material or substance which flows or moves
whether in a semisolid, liquid, sludge, gas, or other form or state;
(12) Garbage means rejected food wastes, including waste
accumulation of animal, fruit, or vegetable matter used or intended for
food or that attend the preparation, use, cooking, dealing in, or storing
of meat, fish, fowl, fruit, or vegetables, and dead animals rejected by
rendering plants;
(13) Hazardous waste means a solid waste, or combination of solid
wastes, which because of its quantity, concentration, or physical,
chemical, or infectious characteristics may (a) cause or significantly
contribute to an increase in mortality or an increase in serious
irreversible, or incapacitating reversible, illness or (b) pose a
substantial present or potential hazard to human or animal health or the
environment when improperly treated, stored, transported, disposed of, or
otherwise managed;
(14) Injection well means a well into which fluids are injected;
(15) Junk means old scrap, copper, brass, iron, steel, rope, rags,
-61-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
batteries, paper, trash, rubber debris, waste, dismantled or wrecked
automobiles, or parts thereof, and other old or scrap ferrous or
nonferrous material;
(16) Land pollution means the presence upon or within the land
resources of the state of one or more contaminants or combinations of
contaminants, including, but not limited to, refuse, garbage, rubbish, or
junk, in such quantities and of such quality as will or are likely to (a)
create a nuisance, (b) be harmful, detrimental, or injurious to public
health, safety, or welfare, (c) be injurious to plant and animal life and
property, or (d) be detrimental to the economic and social development,
the scenic beauty, or the enjoyment of the natural attractions of the
state;
(17) Livestock waste control facility has the same meaning as in
section 54-2417;
(18) Manifest means the form used for identifying the quantity,
composition, origin, routing, and destination of hazardous waste during
its transportation from the point of generation to the point of disposal,
treatment, or storage;
(19) Manufacturing facility has the same meaning as in section 6 of
this act;
(20) Mineral exploration hole means a hole bored, drilled, driven,
or dug in the act of exploring for any mineral other than oil or gas;
(21) Mineral production well means a well drilled to promote
extraction of mineral resources or energy, including, but not limited to,
a well designed for (a) mining of sulfur by the Frasch process, (b)
solution mining of sodium chloride, potash, phosphate, copper, uranium,
or any other mineral which can be mined by this process, (c) in situ
combustion of coal, tar sands, oil shale, or any other fossil fuel, or
(d) recovery of geothermal energy for the production of electric power.
Mineral production well shall not include any well designed for
conventional oil or gas production, for use of fluids to promote enhanced
-62-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
recovery of oil or natural gas, or for injection of hydrocarbons for
storage purposes;
(22) (10) Person means shall mean any: Individual; partnership;
limited liability company; association; public or private corporation;
trustee; receiver; assignee; agent; municipality or other governmental
subdivision; public agency; other legal entity; or any officer or
governing or managing body of any public or private corporation,
municipality, governmental subdivision, public agency, or other legal
entity;
(23) Point source means any discernible confined and discrete
conveyance, including, but not limited to, any pipe, ditch, channel,
tunnel, conduit, well, discrete fissure, container, rolling stock, or
vessel or other floating craft from which pollutants are or may be
discharged;
(24) Post-use polymer has the same meaning as in section 8 of this
act;
(25) Processing means to treat, detoxify, neutralize, incinerate,
biodegrade, or otherwise process a hazardous waste to remove the harmful
properties or characteristics of such waste for disposal in accordance
with regulations established by the council;
(26) Recovered feedstock has the same meaning as in section 10 of
this act;
(27) Refuse means putrescible and nonputrescible solid wastes,
except body wastes, and includes garbage, rubbish, ashes, incinerator
ash, incinerator residue, street cleanings, and solid market and
industrial wastes;
(28) Rubbish means nonputrescible solid wastes, excluding ashes,
consisting of both combustible and noncombustible wastes, such as paper,
cardboard, tin cans, yard clippings, wood, glass, bedding, crockery, or
litter of any kind that will be a detriment to the public health and
safety;
-63-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
(29) (11) Rule or regulation means shall mean any rule or regulation
of the department;
(30) Schedule of compliance means a schedule of remedial measures
including an enforceable sequence of actions or operations leading to
compliance with an effluent limitation, other limitation, prohibition, or
standard;
(31) (12) Sewerage system means shall mean pipelines, conduits,
pumping stations, force mains, and all other constructions, devices,
appurtenances, and facilities used for collecting or conducting wastes to
an ultimate point for treatment or disposal;
(32) Solid waste means any garbage, refuse, or sludge from a waste
treatment plant, water supply treatment plant, or air pollution control
facility and other discarded material, including solid, liquid,
semisolid, or contained gaseous material resulting from industrial,
commercial, and mining operations and from community activities. Solid
waste shall not include slag, a product that is a result of the steel
manufacturing process and is managed as an item of value in a controlled
manner and not as a discarded material; solid or dissolved materials in
irrigation return flows or industrial discharges which are point sources
subject to permits under section 402 of the Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C.
1251 et seq., as such section existed on January 1, 2025; source
material, special nuclear material, or byproduct material as defined by
the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, 42 U.S.C. 2014, as such section existed on
January 1, 2025; or post-use polymers and recovered feedstocks converted
at a manufacturing facility or held at such manufacturing facility prior
to conversion through a manufacturing process;
(33) Solid waste management facility means a facility as defined in
section 13-2010;
(34) Solution mining means the use of an injection well and fluids
to promote the extraction of mineral resources;
(35) Storage, when used in connection with hazardous waste, means
-64-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
the containment of hazardous waste, either on a temporary basis or for a
period of years, in such manner as not to constitute disposal of such
hazardous waste;
(36) (13) Treatment works means shall mean any plant or other works
used for the purpose of treating, stabilizing, or holding wastes;
(37) Uranium means tri-uranium oct-oxide;
(38) (14) Wastes means shall mean sewage, industrial waste, and all
other liquid, gaseous, solid, radioactive, or other substances which may
pollute or tend to pollute any air, land, or waters of the state;
(39) Water pollution means the manmade or man-induced alteration of
the chemical, physical, biological, or radiological integrity of water;
(40) Waters of the state means all waters within the jurisdiction of
this state, including all streams, lakes, ponds, impounding reservoirs,
marshes, wetlands, watercourses, waterways, wells, springs, irrigation
systems, drainage systems, and all other bodies or accumulations of
water, surface or underground, natural or artificial, public or private,
situated wholly or partly within or bordering upon the state; and
(41) Well means a bored, drilled, or driven shaft or a dug hole, the
depth of which is greater than the largest surface dimension of such
shaft or hole.
(15) Refuse shall mean putrescible and nonputrescible solid wastes,
except body wastes, and includes garbage, rubbish, ashes, incinerator
ash, incinerator residue, street cleanings, and solid market and
industrial wastes;
(16) Garbage shall mean rejected food wastes, including waste
accumulation of animal, fruit, or vegetable matter used or intended for
food or that attend the preparation, use, cooking, dealing in, or storing
of meat, fish, fowl, fruit, or vegetables, and dead animals rejected by
rendering plants;
(17) Rubbish shall mean nonputrescible solid wastes, excluding
ashes, consisting of both combustible and noncombustible wastes, such as
-65-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
paper, cardboard, tin cans, yard clippings, wood, glass, bedding,
crockery, or litter of any kind that will be a detriment to the public
health and safety;
(18) Junk shall mean old scrap, copper, brass, iron, steel, rope,
rags, batteries, paper, trash, rubber debris, waste, dismantled or
wrecked automobiles, or parts thereof, and other old or scrap ferrous or
nonferrous material;
(19) Land pollution shall mean the presence upon or within the land
resources of the state of one or more contaminants or combinations of
contaminants, including, but not limited to, refuse, garbage, rubbish, or
junk, in such quantities and of such quality as will or are likely to (a)
create a nuisance, (b) be harmful, detrimental, or injurious to public
health, safety, or welfare, (c) be injurious to plant and animal life and
property, or (d) be detrimental to the economic and social development,
the scenic beauty, or the enjoyment of the natural attractions of the
state;
(20) Water pollution shall mean the manmade or man-induced
alteration of the chemical, physical, biological, or radiological
integrity of water;
(21) Waters of the state shall mean all waters within the
jurisdiction of this state, including all streams, lakes, ponds,
impounding reservoirs, marshes, wetlands, watercourses, waterways, wells,
springs, irrigation systems, drainage systems, and all other bodies or
accumulations of water, surface or underground, natural or artificial,
public or private, situated wholly or partly within or bordering upon the
state;
(22) Point source shall mean any discernible confined and discrete
conveyance, including, but not limited to, any pipe, ditch, channel,
tunnel, conduit, well, discrete fissure, container, rolling stock, or
vessel or other floating craft from which pollutants are or may be
discharged;
-66-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
(23) Effluent limitation shall mean any restriction, including a
schedule of compliance, established by the council on quantities, rates,
and concentrations of chemical, physical, biological, and other
constituents which are discharged from point sources into waters of the
state;
(24) Schedule of compliance shall mean a schedule of remedial
measures including an enforceable sequence of actions or operations
leading to compliance with an effluent limitation, other limitation,
prohibition, or standard;
(25) Hazardous waste shall mean a solid waste, or combination of
solid wastes, which because of its quantity, concentration, or physical,
chemical, or infectious characteristics may (a) cause or significantly
contribute to an increase in mortality or an increase in serious
irreversible, or incapacitating reversible, illness or (b) pose a
substantial present or potential hazard to human or animal health or the
environment when improperly treated, stored, transported, disposed of, or
otherwise managed;
(26) Solid waste shall mean any garbage, refuse, or sludge from a
waste treatment plant, water supply treatment plant, or air pollution
control facility and other discarded material, including solid, liquid,
semisolid, or contained gaseous material resulting from industrial,
commercial, and mining operations and from community activities. Solid
waste shall not include slag, a product that is a result of the steel
manufacturing process and is managed as an item of value in a controlled
manner and not as a discarded material; solid or dissolved materials in
irrigation return flows or industrial discharges which are point sources
subject to permits under section 402 of the Clean Water Act, as amended,
33 U.S.C. 1251 et seq.; or source, special nuclear, or byproduct material
as defined by the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended, 42 U.S.C. 2011
et seq.;
(27) Storage, when used in connection with hazardous waste, shall
-67-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
mean the containment of hazardous waste, either on a temporary basis or
for a period of years, in such manner as not to constitute disposal of
such hazardous waste;
(28) Manifest shall mean the form used for identifying the quantity,
composition, origin, routing, and destination of hazardous waste during
its transportation from the point of generation to the point of disposal,
treatment, or storage;
(29) Processing shall mean to treat, detoxify, neutralize,
incinerate, biodegrade, or otherwise process a hazardous waste to remove
such waste's harmful properties or characteristics for disposal in
accordance with regulations established by the council;
(30) Well shall mean a bored, drilled, or driven shaft or a dug
hole, the depth of which is greater than the largest surface dimension of
such shaft or hole;
(31) Injection well shall mean a well into which fluids are
injected;
(32) Fluid shall mean a material or substance which flows or moves
whether in a semisolid, liquid, sludge, gas, or other form or state;
(33) Mineral production well shall mean a well drilled to promote
extraction of mineral resources or energy, including, but not limited to,
a well designed for (a) mining of sulfur by the Frasch process, (b)
solution mining of sodium chloride, potash, phosphate, copper, uranium,
or any other mineral which can be mined by this process, (c) in situ
combustion of coal, tar sands, oil shale, or any other fossil fuel, or
(d) recovery of geothermal energy for the production of electric power.
Mineral production well shall not include any well designed for
conventional oil or gas production, for use of fluids to promote enhanced
recovery of oil or natural gas, or for injection of hydrocarbons for
storage purposes;
(34) Mineral exploration hole shall mean a hole bored, drilled,
driven, or dug in the act of exploring for a mineral other than oil and
-68-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
gas;
(35) Solution mining shall mean the use of an injection well and
fluids to promote the extraction of mineral resources;
(36) Uranium shall mean tri-uranium oct-oxide;
(37) Solid waste management facility shall mean a facility as
defined in section 13-2010; and
(38) Livestock waste control facility shall have the same meaning as
in section 54-2417.
Sec. 60. Section 81-15,160, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-15,160 (1) The Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive Fund is
created. The department shall deduct from the fund amounts sufficient to
reimburse itself for its costs of administration of the fund. The fund
shall be administered by the department. The fund shall consist of
proceeds from the fees imposed pursuant to the Waste Reduction and
Recycling Incentive Act and the Extended Producer Responsibility Data
Collection Act.
(2) The fund may be used for purposes which include, but are not
limited to:
(a) Technical and financial assistance to political subdivisions for
creation of recycling systems and for modification of present recycling
systems;
(b) Recycling and waste reduction projects, including public
education, planning, and technical assistance;
(c) Market development for recyclable materials separated by
generators, including public education, planning, and technical
assistance;
(d) Capital assistance for establishing private and public
intermediate processing facilities for recyclable materials and
facilities using recyclable materials in new products;
(e) Programs which develop and implement composting of yard waste
-69-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
and composting with sewage sludge;
(f) Technical assistance for waste reduction and waste exchange for
waste generators;
(g) Programs to assist communities and counties to develop and
implement household hazardous waste management programs;
(h) Capital assistance for establishing private and public
facilities to manufacture combustible waste products and to incinerate
combustible waste to generate and recover energy resources, except that
no disbursements shall be made under this section for scrap tire
processing related to tire-derived fuel; and
(i) Grants for reimbursement of costs to cities of the first class,
cities of the second class, villages, and counties of five thousand or
fewer population for the deconstruction of abandoned buildings. Eligible
deconstruction costs will be related to the recovery and processing of
recyclable or reusable material from the abandoned buildings.
(3) Grants up to one million five hundred thousand dollars annually
shall be available until June 30, 2029, for new scrap tire projects only,
if acceptable scrap tire project applications are received. Eligible
categories of disbursement under section 81-15,161 may include, but are
not limited to:
(a) Reimbursement for the purchase of crumb rubber generated and
used in Nebraska, with disbursements not to exceed fifty percent of the
cost of the crumb rubber;
(b) Reimbursement for the purchase of tire-derived product which
utilizes a minimum of twenty-five percent recycled tire content, with
disbursements not to exceed twenty-five percent of the product's retail
cost;
(c) Participation in the capital costs of building, equipment, and
other capital improvement needs or startup costs for scrap tire
processing or manufacturing of tire-derived product, with disbursements
not to exceed fifty percent of such costs or five hundred thousand
-70-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
dollars, whichever is less;
(d) Participation in the capital costs of building, equipment, or
other startup costs needed to establish collection sites or to collect
and transport scrap tires, with disbursements not to exceed fifty percent
of such costs;
(e) Cost-sharing for the manufacturing of tire-derived product, with
disbursements not to exceed twenty dollars per ton or two hundred fifty
thousand dollars, whichever is less, to any person annually;
(f) Cost-sharing for the processing of scrap tires, with
disbursements not to exceed twenty dollars per ton or two hundred fifty
thousand dollars, whichever is less, to any person annually;
(g) Cost-sharing for the use of scrap tires for civil engineering
applications for specified projects, with disbursements not to exceed
twenty dollars per ton or two hundred fifty thousand dollars, whichever
is less, to any person annually;
(h) Disbursement to a political subdivision up to one hundred
percent of costs incurred in cleaning up scrap tire collection and
disposal sites; and
(i) Costs related to the study provided in section 81-15,159.01.
The director shall give preference to projects which utilize scrap
tires generated and used in Nebraska.
(4) Priority for grants made under section 81-15,161 shall be given
to grant proposals demonstrating a formal public/private partnership
except for grants awarded from fees collected under subsection (6) of
section 13-2042.
(5) Grants awarded from fees collected under subsection (6) of
section 13-2042 may be renewed for up to a five-year grant period. Such
applications shall include an updated integrated solid waste management
plan pursuant to section 13-2032. Annual disbursements are subject to
available funds and the grantee meeting established grant conditions.
Priority for such grants shall be given to grant proposals showing
-71-

LB607 LB607
2025 2025
regional participation and programs which address the first integrated
solid waste management hierarchy as stated in section 13-2018 which shall
include toxicity reduction. Disbursements for any one year shall not
exceed fifty percent of the total fees collected after rebates under
subsection (6) of section 13-2042 during that year.
(6) Any person who stores waste tires in violation of section
13-2033, which storage is the subject of abatement or cleanup, shall be
liable to the State of Nebraska for the reimbursement of expenses of such
abatement or cleanup paid by the department.
(7) The department may receive gifts, bequests, and any other
contributions for deposit in the Waste Reduction and Recycling Incentive
Fund. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the
direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Waste Reduction and
Recycling Incentive Fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion
Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 61. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2026.
Sec. 62. Original sections 13-2001, 13-2003, 13-2010, 13-2034,
13-2042, 81-1502, and 81-15,160, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
are repealed.
-72-